Massachusetts, session 194th, H674.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law to the
contrary, Chapter 70B, section 2 of the general laws, as appearing in the 2006 official edition, is
hereby amended by including herein the following definition:
Ergonomics: the scientific discipline concerned with designing to physical, cognitive,
and organizational needs of students and educators, in an effort to optimize safety, comfort and
ease of use, productivity, and performance.
SECTION 2. Chapter 70B, section 3 shall be amended by adding section 3(x):
to consider the feasibility of the integration of ergonomic models appropriate for
classrooms and laboratories within the scope of the construction or rehabilitation of a particular
of 2

proposal; the investment of brick and mortar, and its beneficial impact to the students and faculty
of the school.
of 2